Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 10.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-529
Enterprise project; commission; duties.

To implement enterprise projects pursuant to sections 86-525 to 86-530, the commission shall:

(1) Develop procedures and issue guidelines regarding the review, approval, and monitoring of enterprise projects; and

(2) Coordinate with the Chief Information Officer to monitor the status of enterprise projects, including a complete accounting of all project costs by fund source.

Laws 1996, LB 1190, § 10;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 43;

Laws 2000, LB 1349, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-1199;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 299;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 10.